Utah statutes.
61-2g-313.   State-certified residential appraiser -- Authority and qualifications.

(1)  An applicant for certification as a residential appraiser shall provide to the division evidence of:

(a)  the applicant's good moral character, honesty, competency, integrity, and truthfulness;

(b)  completion of the certification examination with a satisfactory score as determined by the Appraisal Qualification Board;

(c) (i)  an associate degree or higher degree from an accredited:

(A)  college;

(B)  junior college;

(C)  community college; or

(D)  university; or

(ii)  successfully passing a curriculum determined by rule of collegiate level subject matter courses from an accredited:

(A)  college;

(B)  junior college;

(C)  community college; or

(D)  university;

(d)  satisfactory completion of not less than 200 classroom hours in a curriculum:

(i)  of specific appraisal education determined by rule made by the board, with the concurrence of the division; and

(ii)  that includes a course in the Uniform Standards of Professional Practice or its equivalent that is approved by the Appraisal Qualification Board;

(e)  the minimum number of hours of experience in real property appraisal as established by rule; and

(f)  acquiring the experience required under Subsection (1)(e) within a reasonable period, as determined by rule, immediately preceding the filing of the application for certification.

(2)  Upon request by the division, an applicant shall make available to the division for examination:

(a)  a detailed listing of the real estate appraisal reports or file memoranda for each year for which experience is claimed; and

(b)  a sample selected by the division of appraisal reports that the applicant has prepared in the course of the applicant's appraisal practice.

(3)  The classroom hours required by Subsection (1)(d) shall be provided by:

(a)  a college or university;

(b)  a community or junior college;

(c)  a real estate appraisal or real estate related organization;

(d)  a state or federal agency or commission;

(e)  a proprietary school;

(f)  a provider approved by a state certification and licensing agency; or

(g)  the Appraisal Foundation or its boards.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 289, 2011 General Session

